Utah statutes.
77-13-6.   Withdrawal of plea.

(1)  A plea of not guilty may be withdrawn at any time prior to conviction.

(2) (a)  A plea of guilty or no contest may be withdrawn only upon leave of the court and a showing that it was not knowingly and voluntarily made.

(b)  A request to withdraw a plea of guilty or no contest, except for a plea held in abeyance, shall be made by motion before sentence is announced.  Sentence may not be announced unless the motion is denied.  For a plea held in abeyance, a motion to withdraw the plea shall be made within 30 days of pleading guilty or no contest.

(c)  Any challenge to a guilty plea not made within the time period specified in Subsection (2)(b) shall be pursued under Title 78B, Chapter 9, Post-Conviction Remedies Act, and Rule 65C, Utah Rules of Civil Procedure.

